Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-508
Lots; receptacles; sale; power to regulate.

Such association shall have power to adopt such rules and regulations as it deems expedient for disposing of and conveying burial lots, crypts, niches and other places for the disposal of the dead.

R.S.1866, c. 25, § 50, p. 207;

Laws 1885, c. 22, § 1, p. 182;

Laws 1905, c. 39, § 1, p. 276;

Laws 1911, c. 27, § 1, p. 177;

R.S.1913, § 683;

Laws 1917, c. 12, § 1, p. 72;

C.S.1922, § 592;

Laws 1925, c. 138, § 1, p. 366;

C.S.1929, § 13-505;

Laws 1941, c. 18, § 1, p. 104;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 13-505;

R.S.1943, § 12-508.